Colorado, session 2026A, HB1063.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 25.5-5-428 as
follows:
25.5-5-428. Secure transportation providers - accessible list.
THE STATE DEPARTMENT SHALL PUBLISH ON THE STATE
DEPARTMENT'S WEBSITE AN EASILY ACCESSIBLE LIST OF SECURE
TRANSPORTATION PROVIDERS, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 27-65-102, THAT
HAVE CONTRACTS WITH MANAGED CARE ENTITIES. THE LIST MUST INCLUDE
THE CONTACT INFORMATION FOR THE SECURE TRANSPORTATION PROVIDER,
INCLUDING AN ACTIVE PHONE NUMBER OR WEBSITE.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 27-50-404, add (1)(d)
as follows:
27-50-404. Care coordination - responsibilities of behavioral
health administrative services organizations - coordination with
managed care entities.
(1) (d) THE BHA SHALL PUBLISH ON THE BHA'S WEBSITE AN EASILY
ACCESSIBLE LIST OF SECURE TRANSPORTATION PROVIDERS, AS DEFINED IN
SECTION 27-65-102, THAT HAVE CONTRACTS WITH BEHAVIORAL HEALTH
ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES ORGANIZATIONS. THE LIST MUST INCLUDE THE
CONTACT INFORMATION FOR THE SECURE TRANSPORTATION PROVIDER,
INCLUDING AN ACTIVE PHONE NUMBER OR WEBSITE.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1063

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1063